Utah statutes.
17C-1-414.   Project area boundaries that divide a tax parcel -- Deletion of parcel from tax increment calculation.

(1)  If the boundaries of a project area, as described in the project area plan, include part of a tax parcel and exclude part of the same tax parcel, the agency shall provide the assessor of the county in which the project area is located a metes and bounds description of the part of the tax parcel included within the project area boundaries.

(2)  If an agency fails to comply with the requirement of Subsection (1), the assessor of the county in which the tax parcel is located may exclude that parcel from the project area for purposes of calculating tax increment to be paid to the agency until the agency complies with the requirement of Subsection (1).

